Washington statutes.
RCW 35.100.050

Determination of amount of revenue.

A city or town shall determine at its own cost the amount of local sales and use tax increment revenue that may be generated in the downtown and neighborhood commercial districts it designates. The department of revenue may, at its discretion, provide advice or other assistance to cities and towns to assist in determining local sales and use tax increment revenue.

[ 2002 c 79 s 5.]